Maine, session 132, LD644.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §773-A, sub-§3, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 286, §4, is
amended to read:
C. May be employed by a parent, but a parent is prohibited from employing the parent's
minor child who is 16 years of age or older and under 18 years of age in occupations
declared hazardous by the director in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to section
772 and in accordance with 29 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 570; and
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §773-A, sub-§3, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 286, §4, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §774, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2017, c. 286, §5, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 26 MRSA §774, sub-§3, as amended by PL 1991, c. 713, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 26 MRSA §774, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2009, c. 211, Pt. B, §23, is
further amended to read:
4. Exemptions. Work performed in the planting, cultivating or harvesting of field
crops or other agricultural employment, including the initial processing of farm crops, not
in direct contact with hazardous machinery or hazardous substances, work performed as an
employed or in-training theatrical actor or film actor or work performed as a summer camp
employee in a youth camp licensed under Title 22, section 2495 is exempt from this section,
provided as long as a minor under 16 years of age has been excused by the local
superintendent of schools in accordance with the policy established by the Commissioner
of Education and the Director of the Bureau of Labor Standards. Work performed in the
taking or catching of lobsters, fish or other marine organisms by any methods or means, or
in the operating of ferries or excursion boats, is exempt from subsection 1, paragraphs A
and C.
Sec. 6. 26 MRSA §774, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 219, §18, is repealed.
Sec. 7. 26 MRSA §781, sub-§1-A, as corrected by RR 2001, c. 1, §39, is amended
to read:
1-A. De minimis violations of section 774. Notwithstanding subsection 1, absent a
finding that reasonably suggests a pattern of knowing and intentional conduct, the bureau
may disregard the following violations of section 774:
A. A violation of the limits on the time that work may begin or end under section 774,
subsection 1, paragraph F or G or section 774, subsection 2, paragraph F, as long as the
violation is no greater than 10 minutes per day;
B. A violation of the number of hours a minor may work in any day under section 774,
subsection 1, paragraph B, C or D or section 774, subsection 2, paragraph C or D, as
long as the violation is not greater than 10 minutes per day; and
C. A violation of the number of hours worked in a week under section 774, subsection
1, paragraph A or B or section 774, subsection 2, paragraph A or B, as long as the
violation is not greater than 50 minutes in a week.
Page 1 - 132LR0755(01)